Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4810.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for various state departments and agencies to supplement appropriations for the fiscal year 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 ending September 30, 2025, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,500,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,500,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,500,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,500,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,500,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,500,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Back-office infrastructure investments $ 3,500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,500,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 3,500,000 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations general sections Sec. 201. Pursuant to section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources under part 1 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 is $3,500,000.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 and the departments, commissions, boards, offices, and programs for which appropriations are made under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY Sec. 301. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for back office infrastructure investments, the department of treasury shall contract with a qualified accounting firm to provide a statewide talent acquisition and training program that does all of the following: (a) Creates a pool of professional staff available via alternative staffing arrangements to local units of government in 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 finance, human resources, and information technology. (b) Provides classroom and on-the-job training for the pool of professional staff to provide those employees with well-rounded skill sets in the areas of finance, human resources, and information technology, according to the staff's chosen career path. (c) Establishes standardized policies and procedures for finance, human resources, and information technology operations to achieve efficient and effective results. (d) Provides standardized technology solutions for finance, human resources, and information technology networks. (2) The contract under subsection (1) must provide for the reimbursement of the qualified accounting firm only for actual expenses of the statewide talent acquisition and training program plus 15% for indirect administration costs. (3) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for back office infrastructure investments are designated as a work project appropriation. Any unencumbered or unallotted funds do not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to provide a statewide talent acquisition and training program available for local units of government and to enhance the overall pool of local government experts in the critical functions of finance, human resources, and information technology. (b) The project will be accomplished by state employees or contracts, or both. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $3,500,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Firm" means that term as defined in section 720 of the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL 339.720. (b) "Local unit of government" means a city, village, township, county, or any intergovernmental, metropolitan, or local department, agency, or authority, or other local political subdivision. (c) "Qualified accounting firm" means a firm that meets all of the following requirements: (i) Is licensed in this state under section 728 of the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL 339.728, to engage in the practice of public accounting in this state. (ii) Provides both bundled and ad hoc services in all of the following areas: (A) Finance. (B) Human resources. (C) Information technology, including network hosting. (D) Financial planning, including investment advisory and fiduciary capabilities. (iii) Is registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA). (iv) Has physical locations within at least 8 of the 10 prosperity regions. (v) For any remaining prosperity regions where the firm does not have a physical location under subparagraph (iv), the firm has a physical location within 60 miles of the prosperity region's 1 border.